Utah statutes.
78B-6-408.   Rights, status, legal relations under instruments, or statutes may be determined.

A person with an interest in a deed, will, or written contract, or whose rights, status, or other legal relations are affected by a statute, municipal ordinance, contract, or franchise, may request the district court to determine any question of construction or validity arising under the instrument, statute, ordinance, contract, or franchise and obtain a declaration of rights, status, or other legal relations.

